Utah statutes.
62A-4a-1008.   Timeframes for deletion of specified information or reports.
(1)  Unless the executive director determines that there is good cause for
keeping a report of abuse or neglect in the Management Information System,
based on standards established by rule, the division shall delete any
reference to:
(a)  a report that is without merit, if no subsequent report involving the
same alleged perpetrator has occurred within one year; or
(b)  a report that is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
unsubstantiated or without merit, if no subsequent report involving the same
alleged perpetrator has occurred within five years.
(2) (a)  The division shall maintain a separation of reports as follows:
(i)  those that are supported;
(ii)  those that are unsupported;
(iii)  those that are without merit;
(iv)  those that are unsubstantiated under the law in effect prior to May 6,
2002;
(v)  those that are substantiated under the law in effect prior to May 6,
2002; and
(vi)  those that are consented-to supported findings under Subsection 62A-
4a-1005(3)(a)(iii).
(b)  Only persons with statutory authority have access to information
contained in any of the reports identified in Subsection (2)(a).
